Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.07.020

Special meeting.

(1) A corporation shall hold a special meeting of shareholders:

(a) On call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized to do so by the articles of incorporation or bylaws; or

(b) Except as set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, if shareholders holding at least ten percent of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting execute, date, and deliver to the corporation one or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held.

(2) The right of shareholders of a public company to call a special meeting may be limited or denied to the extent provided in the articles of incorporation.

(3) If the corporation is other than a public company, the articles of incorporation or bylaws may require the demand specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section be made by a greater percentage, not in excess of twenty-five percent, of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting.

(4) If not otherwise fixed under RCW 23B.07.030 or 23B.07.070, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand a special meeting is the first date on which an executed shareholder demand is delivered to the corporation. No written demand for a special meeting will be effective unless, within 60 days after the earliest date on which a demand delivered to the corporation as required by this section was executed, written demands executed by shareholders holding at least the percentage of votes specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section or, if applicable, fixed in accordance with subsection (2) or (3) of this section, have been delivered to the corporation.

(5) Subject to subsection (6) of this section:

(a) Special shareholders' meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws; and

(b) If no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the corporation's principal office.

(6) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, if the board of directors or another person is authorized in the bylaws to determine the place of special meetings, the board of directors or such other person may, in the sole discretion of the board of directors or such other person, determine that a special meeting will not involve a physical assembly of shareholders at a particular geographic location, but instead will be held solely by means of remote communication, in accordance with RCW 23B.07.080.

(7) Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by RCW 23B.07.050(3) may be conducted at a special shareholders' meeting.

[ 2022 c 42 s 104; 2020 c 57 s 48; 2018 c 55 s 2; 2002 c 297 s 21; 1989 c 165 s 61.]